Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 3. Housing Projects for Veterans.

§§ 36-65 through 36-69.

Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 437, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-65

, pertaining to definitions, derived from 1946, p. 246; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(26a). Former § 36-66, pertaining to housing projects authorized, derived from 1946, p. 247; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(26a). Former
§ 36-67, pertaining to contracts with federal government or agency, derived from 1946, p. 247; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(26). Former § 36-68, pertaining to loans by political subdivisions, derived from 1946, p. 247; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(26a). Former § 36-69, pertaining to effect on existing laws, derived from 1946, p. 247; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3145(26a).